Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2686.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.03, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Office. (a) The Office of Commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency is created and is under the supervision and control of the commissioner, who is appointed by the governor under the provisions of section 15.06. (b) The commissioner may appoint a deputy commissioner and assistant commissioners who shall be in the unclassified service. (c) The commissioner shall make all decisions on behalf of the agency. new text begin (d) The commissioner must be licensed as a professional engineer under sections 326.02 to 326.15. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 5, 2027. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 174.02, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Appointment. The department shall be supervised and controlled by the commissioner of transportation, who shall be appointed by the governor and serve under the provisions of section 15.06.new text begin The commissioner must be licensed as a professional engineer under sections 326.02 to 326.15.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 5, 2027. new text end